Utah statutes.
59-2-1348.   Certificate of redemption.
If any property is redeemed, the county treasurer shall make the proper entry
in the record of tax sales filed in the treasurer's office and issue a
certificate of redemption, which is prima facie evidence of the redemption,
and may be recorded in the office of the county recorder without
acknowledgment.
